District of Columbia statutes.
46-403

Marriages void from date of decree; age of consent.

The following marriages in said District shall be illegal, and shall be void from the time when their nullity shall be declared by decree, namely:

(1)

The marriage of a person adjudged to be, or to have been at the time a marriage was performed, unable by reason of mental incapacity to give valid consent to marriage;

(2)

Any marriage the consent to which of either party has been procured by force or fraud;

(3)

Repealed.

(4)

When either of the parties is under the age of consent, which is hereby declared to be 16 years of age.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1391, ch. 854, § 1285
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 543, ch. 1329
Aug. 12, 1937, 50 Stat. 626, ch. 596, § 1
July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 5(d), 23 DCR 1182
Sept. 11, 2008, D.C. Law 17-222, § 2, 55 DCR 8295
D.C. Law 17-222 rewrote par. (1) and repealed par. (3).
1973 Ed., § 30-103.
1981 Ed., § 30-103.
This section is referenced in § 16-903 and § 46-401.
Proceedings to annul marriage, see §§ 16-903, 16-904.